Utah statutes.
59-1-210.   General powers and duties.
The powers and duties of the commission are as follows:
(1)  to sue and be sued in its own name;
(2)  to adopt rules and policies consistent with the Constitution and laws of
this state to govern the commission, executive director, division directors,
and commission employees in the performance of their duties;
(3)  to adopt rules and policies consistent with the Constitution and laws of
the state, to govern county boards and officers in the performance of any duty
relating to assessment, equalization, and collection of taxes;
(4)  to prescribe the use of forms relating to the assessment of property for
state or local taxation, the equalization of those assessments, the reporting
of property or income for state or local taxation purposes, or for the
computation of those taxes and the reporting of any information, statistics,
or data required by the commission;
(5)  to administer and supervise the tax laws of the state;
(6)  to prepare and maintain from year to year a complete record of all lands
subject to taxation in this state, and all machinery used in mining and all
property or surface improvements upon or appurtenant to mines or mining
claims;
(7)  to exercise general supervision over assessors and county boards of
equalization including the authority to enforce Section 59-2-303.1, and over
other county officers in the performance of their duties relating to the
assessment of property and collection of taxes, so that all assessments of
property are just and equal, according to fair market value, and that the tax
burden is distributed without favor or discrimination;
(8)  to reconvene any county board of equalization which, when reconvened, may
only address business approved by the commission and extend the time for which
any county board of equalization may sit for the equalization of assessments;
(9)  to confer with, advise, and direct county treasurers, assessors, and
other county officers in matters relating to the assessment and equalization
of property for taxation and the collection of taxes;
(10)  to provide for and hold annually at such time and place as may be
convenient a district or state convention of county assessors, auditors, and
other county officers to consider and discuss matters relative to taxation,
uniformity of valuation, and changes in the law relative to taxation and
methods of assessment, to which county assessors and other officers called to
attend shall attend at county expense;
(11)  to direct proceedings, actions, and prosecutions to enforce the laws
relating to the penalties, liabilities, and punishments of public officers,
persons, and officers or agents of corporations for failure or neglect to
comply with the statutes governing the reporting, assessment, and taxation of
property;
(12)  to cause complaints to be made in the proper court seeking removal from
office of assessors, auditors, members of county boards, and other assessing,
taxing, or disbursing officers, who are guilty of official misconduct or
neglect of duty;
(13)  to require county attorneys to immediately institute and prosecute
actions and proceedings in respect to penalties, forfeitures, removals, and
punishments for violations of the laws relating to the assessment and taxation
of property in their respective counties;
(14)  to require any person to furnish any information required by the
commission to ascertain the value and the relative burden borne by all kinds
of property in the state, and to require from all state and local officers any
information necessary for the proper discharge of the duties of the
commission;
(15)  to examine all records relating to the valuation of property of any
person;
(16)  to subpoena witnesses to appear and give testimony and produce records
relating to any matter before the commission;
(17)  to cause depositions of witnesses to be taken as in civil actions at the
request of the commission or any party to any matter or proceeding before the
commission;
(18)  to authorize any member or employee of the commission to administer
oaths and affirmations in any matter or proceeding relating to the exercise of
the powers and duties of the commission;
(19)  to visit periodically each county of the state, to investigate and
direct the work and methods of local assessors and other officials in the
assessment, equalization, and taxation of property, and to ascertain whether
the law requiring the assessment of all property not exempt from taxation, and
the collection of taxes, have been properly administered and enforced;
(20)  to carefully examine all cases where evasion or violation of the laws
for assessment and taxation of property is alleged, to ascertain whether
existing laws are defective or improperly administered;
(21)  to furnish to the governor from time to time such assistance and
information as the governor requires;
(22)  to transmit to the governor and to each member of the Legislature
recommendations as to legislation which will correct or eliminate defects in
the operation of the tax laws and will equalize the burden of taxation within
the state;
(23)  to correct any error in any assessment made by it at any time before the
tax is due and report the correction to the county auditor, who shall enter
the corrected assessment upon the assessment roll;
(24)  to compile and publish statistics relating to taxation in the state and
prepare and submit an annual budget to the governor for inclusion in the state
budget to be submitted to the Legislature;
(25)  to perform any further duties imposed by law, and exercise all powers
necessary in the performance of its duties;
(26)  to adopt a schedule of fees assessed for services provided by the
commission, unless otherwise provided by statute.  The fee shall be reasonable
and fair, and shall reflect the cost of services provided.  Each fee
established in this manner shall be submitted to and approved by the
Legislature as part of the commission's annual appropriations request.  The
commission may not charge or collect any fee proposed in this manner without
approval by the Legislature;
(27)  to comply with the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4,
Administrative Procedures Act, in its adjudicative proceedings; and
(28)  to distribute the money deposited into the Rural Health Care Facilities
Account as required by Section 26-9-4.
